Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB465.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 618. Commercial Property Tax Redistribution.--(a) Each intermediate unit shall establish a commercial property tax group for the purpose of collecting a portion of commercial property tax for redistribution to school districts served by the intermediate unit.(b) Each school district shall select one representative to serve on the commercial property tax group established by the intermediate unit that serves the school district.(c) Each school district shall provide the following to its 1234567891011121314151617181920 respective commercial property tax group:(1) In the first tax year beginning after the effective date of this paragraph, ten per centum of the property taxes that the school district collected for that year on commercial properties located in the school district with a minimum assessment value of ten million dollars ($10,000,000).(2) In the second tax year beginning after the effective date of this paragraph, twenty per centum of the property taxes that the school district collected for that year on commercial properties located in the school district with a minimum assessment value of ten million dollars ($10,000,000).(3) In the third tax year beginning after the effective date of this paragraph, thirty per centum of the property taxes that the school district collected for that year on commercial properties located in the school district with a minimum assessment value of ten million dollars ($10,000,000).(4) In the fourth tax year beginning after the effective date of this paragraph, forty per centum of the property taxes that the school district collected for that year on commercial properties located in the school district with a minimum assessment value of ten million dollars ($10,000,000).(5) In the fifth tax year beginning after the effective date of this paragraph, fifty per centum of the property taxes that the school district collected for that year on commercial properties located in the school district with a minimum assessment value of ten million dollars ($10,000,000).(6) In the sixth tax year beginning after the effective date of this paragraph, sixty per centum of the property taxes that the school district collected for that year on commercial properties located in the school district with a minimum 20250HB0465PN0448 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assessment value of ten million dollars ($10,000,000).(7) In the seventh tax year beginning after the effective date of this paragraph and each tax year thereafter, seventy per centum of the property taxes that the school district collected for that year on commercial properties located in the school district with a minimum assessment value of ten million dollars ($10,000,000).(d) Each commercial property tax group under this section shall establish a revenue account to deposit commercial property taxes from each school district.(e) Each commercial property tax group under this section shall distribute the revenue to each school district served by the intermediate unit proportionately based on the school district's average daily membership in comparison to the total average daily membership for all school districts served by the intermediate unit.(f) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Average daily membership." As defined in section 2501(3)."Commercial property tax." Real property taxes collected on commercial real estate."Commercial real estate." As follows:(1) Real estate that is zoned for a use other than residential or agricultural purposes.(2) For a property that is zoned for mixed-use that includes residential purposes, the term includes the portion of the real property not designated for residential use based on the square footage of residential space in relation to the total square footage of the real property.20250HB0465PN0448 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The term does not include single-family residential units or building lots such as condominiums, townhouses or homes in a subdivision when sold, leased or otherwise conveyed on a unit-by-unit basis even though the units may be part of a larger building or parcel of real estate.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0465PN0448 - 4 - 123456